test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UUHL_STEM_3.gt-norm.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_UUHL_STEM_3 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_UUHL_STEM_3

     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: t'ahlgwáalaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INDIRECT+PAST: t'ahlgwáalaan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: t'ahlgwáalaas
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: t'ahlgwáalaa.ang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: t'ahlgwáal'ahlanggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+CERTAIN+PAST: t'ahlgwáal'ahlanggan
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: t'ahlgwáal'ahlanggiinii
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: t'ahlgwáal'ahlans
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: t'ahlgwáalaa'ahlang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: t'ahlgwáalaa'ahlanggaa
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: t'ahlgwáalaa'ahlanggang
     t'ahlgúuhl+V+REFLEXIVE: t'ahlgwáal'ahl
